Hawaii statutes.
[§201N-5] Approval of state permits.
When the coordinator accepts a permit plan application for a renewable energy
facility that requires state permits, the coordinator shall facilitate the
timely processing of the permit plan with the state agency or agencies
responsible for approving, monitoring, and enforcing the terms and conditions
of the permit in accordance with the permit plan. [L 2008, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next